Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,108
Prohibited abortion; penalty.

Any person
who intentionally or recklessly performs or attempts to perform an abortion
in violation of section 28-3,106 is guilty of a Class IV felony. No penalty
shall be assessed against the woman upon whom the abortion is performed or
attempted to be performed.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 7.